Tennessee, session 114, SB2279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-128(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) In addition to identifying prescribers pursuant to subsections (a) and (b),
beginning July 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the department shall identify high-risk
prescribers based on clinical outcomes, including patient overdoses. The department
shall determine which providers are high-risk prescribers and the criteria to make such
determination. The department shall make the criteria for identifying prescribers as high-
risk prescribers publicly available on the department's website. Providers determined to
be high-risk prescribers pursuant to this subdivision (c)(1) are subject to selected chart
review and investigation by the department.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-128(c)(3)(D), is amended by
deleting "four-week" and substituting "thirty-day".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-128, is amended by adding the
following as new subdivisions:
(7) Subdivision (c)(1) does not apply to pain management specialists, as defined
in § 63-1-301.
(8) The department shall expunge the identification of a prescriber as a high-risk
prescriber pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) upon receiving proof that the prescriber has
completed the course requirements of subdivision (c)(3)(A), and shall notify the
prescriber in writing of the expungement.
SB2279
012218
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-306, is amended by inserting
the following as a new subsection (c), and redesignating the existing subsection (c) and
remaining subsections accordingly:
(c)
(1) A pain management specialist may provide coverage for and serve as
medical director in the place of a medical director who is unable to fulfill the
medical director's duties on a temporary basis because of illness, vacation, or
unavailability. Such coverage may be provided on a temporary, short-term basis
and does not require the in-person presence of the pain management specialist
who is providing coverage for the medical director, as long as that pain
management specialist is immediately available by phone.
(2) Temporary service in the capacity of a medical director pursuant to
subdivision (c)(1) does not count against the limit of four (4) pain management
clinics at which a pain management specialist may serve as medical director
under § 63-1-309(c).
(3) The department shall not require a medical director to notify the
department of the identity of another pain management specialist who serves as
medical director pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) during the medical director's
absence.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-309(c), is amended by deleting
"weekly" and substituting "quarterly".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-316, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(k) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee is authorized to issue
advisory private letter rulings to any affected licensee who makes such a request
- 2 - 012218

regarding any matters within this part. Such private letter ruling only affects the licensee
making such inquiry and has no precedential value for any other inquiry or future
contested case. Any dispute regarding a private letter ruling may, if the commissioner or
the commissioner's designee chooses to do so, be resolved pursuant to the declaratory
order provisions of § 4-5-223.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-316(c), is amended by adding
the following to the end of the subsection:
The department shall make available to the public on its website all inspection criteria
required for compliance by pain management clinics.
SECTION 8. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 012218